Georgia, session 2025_26, HB769.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the Gwinnett Judicial Circuit and providing for its powers, duties,
jurisdiction, and officers, approved February 12, 1960 (Ga. L. 1960, p. 110), as amended,
particularly by an Act approved April 10, 2014 (Ga. L. 2014, p. 3722), is amended by
revising Section 2A as follows:
"SECTION 2A.
The compensation and allowances of the judges of the Superior Court of the Gwinnett
Judicial Circuit shall be as provided by law and in addition thereto the salary of each judge
H. B. 769
- 1 -

LC 47 3588/AP
shall be supplemented in the amount of $80,200.00 annually from the funds of Gwinnett
County. Such supplement shall be paid in equal monthly installments. In addition to such
supplement, the governing authority of Gwinnett County is authorized to pay the superior
court judges of the Gwinnett Judicial Circuit such amount as shall be fixed by the
governing authority."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, provided that an Act to amend Article 1 of
Chapter 6 of Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions concerning superior courts, so as to modify provisions regarding the compensation
received by superior court judges, and to amend Code Section 45-7-4 of the Official Code
of Georgia Annotated, relating to annual salaries of certain state officials and cost-of-living
adjustments, which prohibits the payment of local salary supplements to superior court
judges, is not enacted in the 2025 session of the General Assembly of Georgia. If such Act
is approved, this Act shall not become effective and shall be automatically repealed on
July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 769
- 2 -